District of Columbia statutes.
22-1718

Advertising and promotion; sale and possession of lottery and numbers tickets and slips.

(a)

Nothing in subchapter I of this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the advertising and promotion of excepted permissible gambling activities pursuant to § 22-1717, hereof, including, but not limited to, the sale, by agents authorized by the District of Columbia, and the possession of tickets, certificates, or slips for lottery and daily numbers games excepted and permissible pursuant to § 22-1717, hereof, and the sale, lease, purchase, or possession of tickets, slips, certificates, or cards for bingo, raffles, and Monte Carlo night parties, excepted and permissible pursuant to § 22-1717, hereof.

(b)

Nothing in § 22-1701 shall prohibit advertising a lottery by the Maryland State Lottery so long as Maryland does not prohibit advertising or otherwise publishing an account of a lottery by the District of Columbia.

History

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-172, § 3, 27 DCR 4736
Apr. 11, 1987, D.C. Law 6-220, § 2(a)(3), 34 DCR 900
June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-272, § 2(a), 43 DCR 4672
May 22, 1998, D.C. Law 12-114, § 2, 45 DCR 486

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-1518.